Utah statutes.
72-9-302.   Interstate agreements.

(1)  The department may enter into agreements with other states to allow the cooperative base state safety and insurance regulation of motor carriers transporting property or passengers in interstate commerce.

(2)  An agreement may authorize another state to:

(a)  accept the filing of a certificate and affidavit of insurance;

(b)  issue a revocation, suspension, restriction, probation, and reinstatement order or notice; and

(c)  collect and disburse any fee to and from another state that participates in the base state program.

(3)  An agreement may allow the exchange of information for audit, reporting, and enforcement purposes.

